Illinois, session 104th, HB2106.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Manufacturing Illinois Chips for Real 5Opportunity (MICRO) Act is amended by changing Section 110-1 6as follows: 7    (35 ILCS 45/110-1)8    Sec. 110-1. Short title. This Article may be cited as the 9the Manufacturing Illinois Chips for Real Opportunity (MICRO) 10Act. References in this Article to "this Act" mean this 11Article.12(Source: P.A. 102-700, eff. 4-19-22.)